Florida, session 2026, HB1155.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (15) is added to section 561.42,
Florida Statutes, to read:
561.42 Tied house evil; financial aid and assistance to
vendor by manufacturer, distributor, importer, primary American
source of supply, brand owner or registrant, or any broker,
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1155-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1155 2026
sales agent, or sales person thereof, prohibited; procedure for
enforcement; exception.—
(15) Nothing in this section or any other provision of the
Beverage Law shall prohibit a malt beverage manufacturer who
produces less than 31,000 gallons of malt beverages within a
calendar year from selling and delivering the malt beverages
produced by the manufacturer directly to vendors.
Section 2. Subsections (12) through (21) of section
563.022, Florida Statutes, are renumbered as subsections (13)
through (22), respectively, and a new subsection (12) is added
to that section, to read:
563.022 Relations between beer distributors and
manufacturers.—
(12) TERMINATION, CANCELLATION, NONRENEWAL, AND
DISCONTINUANCE OF FRANCHISE AGREEMENT.—
(a) Notwithstanding any provision of law relating to
franchise agreements or any other provision in this section, a
manufacturer may terminate, cancel, nonrenew, or discontinue a
franchise agreement when all of the following occur:
1. The manufacturer produced less than 31,000 gallons of
beer in the 12 months before the effective date of the franchise
agreement.
2. The manufacturer provides written notice of the
termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or discontinuance of the
franchise agreement to the distributor not less than 24 months
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1155-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1155 2026
before the effective date of the termination, cancellation,
nonrenewal, or discontinuance.
3. The manufacturer provides written notice of the
termination, cancellation, nonrenewal, or discontinuance to the
distributor not less than 36 months, but not more than 38
months, after the effective date of the franchise agreement.
(b) A franchise agreement that is terminated, cancelled,
nonrenewed, or discontinued under this subsection is not a
violation of subsection (4), and a manufacturer is not required
to pay reasonable compensation to a distributor.
(c) At the request of a manufacturer, the division may
determine the manufacturer's yearly production amount. A
determination by the division, when certified in writing, is
prima facie evidence of the amount of beer produced by the
manufacturer in a 12-month period. The division may adopt rules
for manufacturers to request written certification of the amount
of beer produced by a manufacturer in a given period. However, a
manufacturer may not make such request more than once in any 12-
month period. A determination by the division that a
manufacturer produces less than 31,000 gallons in a 12-month
period is effective for 3 years.
(d) This subsection applies to all franchise agreements
entered into on or after July 1, 2026, and may not be waived by
any party in a franchise agreement.
Section 3. Paragraph (c) of subsection (2) of section
Page 3 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1155-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 1155 2026
561.221, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
561.221 Licensing of manufacturers and distributors as
vendors and of vendors as manufacturers; conditions and
limitations.—
(2)
(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of the Beverage
Law, a manufacturer holding multiple manufacturing licenses may
transfer malt beverages to a licensed facility, as provided in
s. 563.022(15)(d) s. 563.022(14)(d), in an amount up to the
yearly production amount at the receiving facility. Malt
beverages and other alcoholic beverages manufactured by another
licensed manufacturer, including any malt beverages that are
owned in whole or in part by the manufacturer but are brewed by
another manufacturer, must be obtained through a licensed
distributor that is not also a licensed manufacturer, a licensed
broker or sales agent, or a licensed importer.
Section 4. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 4 of 4
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb1155-00